Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2211
Insurance company; reserve liability; requirements.

The reserve liability for variable annuities shall be established pursuant to the requirements of the standard valuation law in accordance with actuarial procedures that recognize the variable nature of the benefits provided. To the extent that the company's reserve liability with regard to (1) benefits guaranteed as to dollar amount and duration, and (2) funds guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of interest is maintained in any separate account, a portion of the assets of such separate account at least equal to such reserve liability shall be, except as the Director of Insurance may otherwise approve, invested in accordance with the laws of this state governing the investments of life insurance companies.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 11, p. 1264.